Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 8. Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse.

Sec. 18.65.600.
Missing persons information clearinghouse.

There is in the Department of Public Safety the missing persons information clearinghouse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.610.
Duties of missing persons information clearinghouse.

The missing persons information clearinghouse is established as a central repository of information regarding missing persons.

The clearinghouse shall

establish within the state a system and appropriate procedures for communication of information regarding missing persons;

collect, maintain, and disseminate accurate and complete information on missing persons for the purpose of identifying, locating, and returning them;

provide for exchange of information on missing persons within the state;

cooperate with private citizens, local law enforcement agencies, and other state and federal agencies in investigations concerning missing persons;

provide training and assistance to law enforcement agencies to promote effective use of the clearinghouse.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.620.
Duty of law enforcement agencies.

In addition to the requirements of AS

47.10.141

regarding reports of missing minors, a local or state law enforcement agency shall submit to the clearinghouse all missing person reports received by the law enforcement agency that relate to a person who is not located within 48 hours after the first report concerning that person was filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.630.
Medical and dental records of missing persons.

When a person files a report of a missing person with a law enforcement agency or with the clearinghouse, a form authorizing the release of medical and dental records to the law enforcement agency and to the clearinghouse shall be supplied to the family, next of kin, or legal guardian of the missing person. The family, next of kin, or legal guardian of the missing person may complete the release form and deliver the release form to the physician or dentist of the missing person. The physician or dentist who receives a release form signed by the family, next of kin, or legal guardian of the missing person shall release to the law enforcement agency and the clearinghouse only that information that is necessary to identify the missing person.

When the family, next of kin, or legal guardian of a missing person cannot be located or does not exist, a law enforcement agency may execute a written declaration stating that an active investigation is being conducted and that medical and dental records are required for the exclusive purpose of furthering the investigation. Notwithstanding AS

40.25.120

and AS

17.30.155

, the declaration signed by a peace officer under this subsection is sufficient authority for the physician or dentist to release information necessary to aid in the identification of the missing person. The physician or dentist may only release that information that is necessary to identify the missing person.

Medical and dental records obtained under this section shall be provided to the clearinghouse.

When a missing person is found, the law enforcement agency and the clearinghouse shall destroy all records in their files obtained under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.120.

Sec. 18.65.640.
Reports upon finding a missing person.

A person who has filed a missing person report with the clearinghouse or a law enforcement agency shall immediately notify the clearinghouse or the law enforcement agency when the location of the missing person is determined.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.650.
Civil penalty.

The commissioner of public safety, or a person designated by the commissioner of public safety, may file a civil complaint in the district court to enforce AS

18.65.640

. A person who fails to comply with AS

18.65.640

is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.660.
Definition.

In AS

18.65.600

—

18.65.660

, “clearinghouse” means the missing persons information clearinghouse established in AS

18.65.600

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1988)